test/src/morphology/V-outw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - outõ: # Verb 46 'eng /est hautada/fin' - full paradigm
     outõ+V+Inf: outõ
     outõ+V+Ger: outõs
     outõ+V+Sup: outõm
     outõ+V+Sup+Ine: outõmõs
     outõ+V+Sup+Ela: outõmõst
     outõ+V+Sup+Tra: outõmõks
     outõ+V+Sup+Abe: outõmõt
     outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ōtõb
     outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: outõt
     outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: outõbõd
     outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ōtiz
     outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ōtizt, ōtiztõ]
     outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ōtizt, ōtiztõ]
     outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: out
     outõ+V+Cond+Sg3: outõks
     outõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: out
     outõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: out
     outõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: outõgid
     outõ+V+Jus+Sg3: outõg
     outõ+V+Quo+Sg3: outiji
     outõ+V+ActPrfPrc: outõn
     outõ+V+PssPrfPrc: outõd
